California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State, and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, a recipient who is authorized to receive in-home supportive services pursuant to this article, or Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956, administered by the State Department of Social Services, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97, administered by the State Department of Health Care Services, or any combination of these services, shall direct these authorized services, and the authorized services shall be performed by a provider or providers within a workweek and in a manner that complies with the requirements of this section.

(b) (1) A workweek is defined
 as beginning at 12:00 a.m. on Sunday and includes the next consecutive 168 hours, terminating at 11:59 p.m. the following Saturday.

(2) A provider of services specified in subdivision (a) shall not work a total number of hours within a workweek that exceeds 66, in accordance with subdivision (d). The total number of hours worked within a workweek by a provider is defined as the sum of the following:

(A) All hours worked providing authorized services specified in subdivision (a).

(B) Travel time, as defined in subdivision (f), only if federal financial participation is not available to compensate for that travel time. If federal financial participation is available for travel time, as defined in subdivision (f), the travel time shall not be included in the calculation of the total weekly hours worked within a
 workweek, except for purposes of overtime compensation pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) (A) If the authorized in-home supportive services of a recipient cannot be provided by a single provider as a result of the limitation specified in paragraph (2), it is the responsibility of the recipient to employ an additional provider or providers, as needed, to ensure the provider’s authorized services are provided within that provider’s total weekly authorized hours of services established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12301.1.

(B) (i) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section not result in reduced services authorized to recipients of waiver personal care services, as described
 in subdivision (a).

(ii) The State Department of Health Care Services shall work with and assist recipients receiving services pursuant to the Nursing Facility/Acute Hospital Transition and Diversion Waiver or the In-Home Operations Waiver, or their successors, who are at or near their individual cost cap, as that term is used in the waivers, to avoid a reduction in the recipient’s services that may result because of increased overtime pay for providers. As part of this effort, the department shall consider allowing the recipient to exceed the individual cost cap, if appropriate, and authorize exemptions as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 14132.99. The department shall provide timely information to waiver recipients as to the steps that will be taken to implement this clause.

(4) (A) A provider shall inform each recipient of the number of hours that
 the provider is available to work for that recipient, in accordance with this section.

(B) A recipient, the recipient’s authorized representative, or any other entity shall not authorize any provider to work hours that exceed the applicable limitation or limitations of this section.

(C) A recipient may authorize a provider to work hours in excess of the recipient’s weekly authorized hours established pursuant to Section 12301.1 without notification of the county welfare department, in accordance with both of the following:

(i) The authorization does not result in more than 40 hours of authorized services per week being provided.

(ii) The authorization does not exceed the recipient’s authorized hours of monthly services pursuant to paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 12301.1.

(5) For providers of in-home supportive services, the State Department of Social Services or a county may terminate the provider from providing services under the IHSS program if a provider continues to violate the limitations of this section on multiple occasions.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law,
 hours worked by a provider in the performance of services described in subdivision (a) or travel time described in subdivision (f) that exceed 40 hours in a workweek shall be compensated at one and one-half times the provider’s hourly wage.

(d) A provider of services described in subdivision (a) is subject to all of the following, as applicable to the situation of that provider:

(1) (A) A provider who works for one individual recipient of those services shall not work a total number of hours within
 a workweek that exceeds 66 hours. The provision of these services by that provider to the individual recipient shall not exceed the total weekly hours of the services authorized to that recipient, except as additionally authorized pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b). If multiple providers serve the same recipient, it shall continue to be the responsibility of that recipient or the authorized representative of that recipient to schedule the work of the providers to ensure the authorized services of the recipient are provided in accordance with this section.

(B) If a recipient’s weekly authorized hours are adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12301.1 and exceed 66 hours, and at the time of adjustment the recipient currently receives all authorized hours of service from one provider, that provider shall be deemed authorized to work the recipient’s county-approved adjusted
 hours for that week, but only if the additional hours of work, based on the adjustment, do not exceed the total number of hours worked that are compensable at an overtime pay rate that the provider would have been authorized to work in that month if the weekly hours had not been adjusted.

(2) A provider of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a) who serves multiple recipients is not authorized to, and shall not, work more than 66 total hours in a workweek, regardless of the number of recipients for whom the provider provides services authorized by subdivision (a). Providers are subject to the limits of each recipient’s total authorized weekly hours of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a), except as additionally authorized pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the 66-hour workweek
 limit described in subdivision (b) does not apply to a provider of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a), and a recipient of those services may receive those services from a requested provider, if the provider has an approved exemption, as set forth in subparagraph (A) or (B). A provider who has an approved exemption pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) shall not work a total number of hours in excess of 360 hours per month combined for the recipients of in-home supportive services served by that provider and may not exceed a recipient’s monthly authorized hours.

(A) A provider is eligible for an exemption if that provider met all of the following on or before January 31, 2016:

(i) The provider provided services to two or more recipients of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a).

(ii) The provider lived in the same home as all of the recipients for whom that provider provided services.

(iii) The provider is related, biologically, by adoption, or as a foster caregiver, legal guardian, or conservator, to all of the recipients for whom the provider provides services as the recipients’ parent, stepparent, foster or adoptive parent, grandparent, legal guardian, or conservator.

(B) A provider is eligible for an exemption if the provider provides services to two or more recipients of in-home supportive services described in subdivision (a), if each recipient for whom the provider provides services has at least one of the following circumstances that puts the recipient at serious risk of placement in out-of-home care if the services could not be provided by that provider:

(i) The
 recipient has complex medical or behavioral needs that must be met by a provider who lives in the same home as the recipient.

(ii) The recipient lives in a rural or remote area where available providers are limited, and, as a result, the recipient is unable to hire another provider.

(iii) The recipient is unable to hire another provider who speaks the same language as the recipient, resulting in the recipient being unable to direct the recipient’s own care.

(C) At the time of assessment or reassessment, the county shall evaluate each recipient to determine if the recipient’s circumstances appear to indicate that the provider for that recipient may be eligible for an exemption described in subparagraph (A) or (B). The county shall then inform those recipients about the potentially applicable exemptions and the process
 by which they or their provider may apply for the exemption.

(D) On a one-time basis upon implementation of this paragraph, the department shall mail an informational notice and an exemption request form to all providers of multiple recipients who may be eligible for an exemption pursuant to subparagraph (B) and to the recipients to whom those providers provide services.

(E) (i) The county shall review the requests for consideration for an exemption described in subparagraph (B) pursuant to a process developed by the department with input from counties and stakeholders. The county shall consider whether the denial of an exemption would place a recipient or recipients at serious risk of placement in out-of-home care due to any of the circumstances described in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (B).

(ii) Within 30 days of receiving an application for an exemption described in subparagraph (B) from a provider or from a recipient on behalf of a provider, the county shall mail a written notification letter to the provider and the recipients for whom the provider provides services of its approval or denial of the exemption. If the county denies the exemption, the county shall also explain in the notification letter the reason for the denial and information about the process to request a review by the department, independent of the county’s decision. The county shall use a standardized notification letter, developed by the department in consultation with stakeholders, for purposes of providing the notification letter that is required by this clause.

(iii) (I) A provider whose exemption under subparagraph (B) has been denied, or a recipient on behalf of the provider
 whose exemption under subparagraph (B) has been denied, may request a review by the department, independent of the county’s decision.

(II) The department shall develop the review process with input from stakeholders. At a minimum, the review process shall ensure that it provides the provider or the recipient, or that person’s authorized representative, with the opportunity to speak with, and provide written information to, staff of the department conducting the review about how the recipient meets the criteria described in subparagraph (B) and how any alternative services proposed by the county would place the recipient at serious risk of placement in out-of-home care.

(III) The department shall consider the information provided by the provider or the recipient, or that person’s authorized representative, and the information provided by the county in reaching its decision.

(IV) The department shall mail its written decision within 20 days of the date the provider or the recipient is scheduled to speak with the staff of the department conducting the review, unless the provider or the recipient has requested additional time to submit information and the department has granted that request. The written decision shall inform the provider and the recipients for whom the provider provides services if the exemption is granted or denied. If the department denies the exemption, the department shall also explain in the written decision the reason for the denial.

(iv) The county shall record the number of requests for exemptions that are received from providers or recipients on the provider’s behalf and the number of requests approved or denied, and shall submit these numbers to the department. The department shall record the number of requests for the review by
 the department that are received from providers or recipients and the number of exemptions that are approved or denied through the review process. The numbers by the county and the department shall be posted no later than every three months on the department’s internet website.

(e) Recipients and providers shall be informed of the limitations and requirements contained in this section, through notices at intervals and on forms as determined by the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Health Care Services, as applicable, following consultation with stakeholders.

(f) (1) A provider of services described in subdivision (a) shall not engage in travel time in excess of seven hours per week. For purposes of this subdivision, “travel time” means time spent traveling directly from a location where authorized services specified in subdivision
 (a) are provided to one recipient to another location where authorized services are to be provided to another recipient. A provider shall coordinate hours of work with the provider’s recipients to comply with this section.

(2) The hourly wage to compensate a provider for travel time described in this subdivision when the travel is between two counties shall be the hourly wage of the destination county.

(3) Travel time, and compensation for that travel time, between a recipient of authorized in-home supportive services specified in subdivision (a) and a recipient of authorized waiver personal care services specified in subdivision (a) shall be attributed to the program authorizing services for the recipient to whom the provider is traveling.

(4) Hours spent by a provider while engaged in travel time shall not be
 deducted from the authorized hours of service of any recipient of services specified in subdivision (a).

(5) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall issue guidance and processes for travel time between recipients that will assist the provider and recipient to comply with this subdivision. Each county shall provide technical assistance to providers and recipients, as necessary, to implement this subdivision.

(g) A provider of authorized in-home supportive services specified in subdivision (a) shall timely submit, deliver, or mail, verified by postmark or request for delivery, a signed payroll timesheet within two weeks after the end of each bimonthly payroll period. Notwithstanding any other law, a provider who submits an untimely payroll timesheet for providing authorized in-home supportive services specified in subdivision
 (a) shall be paid by the state within 30 days of the receipt of the signed payroll timesheet.

(h) This section does not apply to a contract entered into pursuant to Section 12302 for authorized in-home supportive services. Contract rates negotiated pursuant to Section 12302 shall be based on costs consistent with a 40-hour workweek.

(i) The state and counties are immune from any liability resulting from implementation of this section.

(j) An action authorized under this section that is implemented in a program authorized pursuant to Section 14132.95, 14132.956, or 14132.97 shall be compliant with federal Medicaid requirements, as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(k) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 110, Sec. 5.   (SB 156)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.41.

(a) For three months following the effective date specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (l) of Section 12300.4, timesheets submitted by providers may be paid in excess of the limitations specified in Section 12300.4, so long as the number of hours worked by the provider within a month do not exceed the authorized hours of the recipient or recipients served by that provider.

(b) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with stakeholders, shall oversee a study of the implementation of Section 12300.4, Section 12301.1, and this section. This study shall cover the 24-month period subsequent to the three-month period specified in subdivision (a). Information collected for the study shall periodically be
 made available to stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of recipients and providers, counties, and the legislative staff. Upon completion of the study, a report shall be submitted to the Legislature.

(c) Using the study described in (b), it is the intent of the Legislature to evaluate implementation of the federal regulations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (l) of Section 12300.4 and make any adjustments determined appropriate or necessary through subsequent legislation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 599.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.5.

The department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall create, and provide to the Legislature, the framework for a permanent provider backup system. The permanent backup provider system shall not be implemented, and state or federal funds appropriated in the 2021–22 fiscal year or any other fiscal year shall not be used, until statutes are enacted to define the parameters of this service, including, but not limited to, the criteria and circumstances when those services may be approved for a recipient who is authorized to receive in-home supportive services pursuant to this article or Sections 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956, as administered by the department, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97, as administered by the State Department of Health Care Services, or any combination of these
 services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 49.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.6.

(a) Effective no sooner than October 1, 2022, and no later than 60 days after the date of the final all-county letter, a county or a public authority, as established pursuant to Section 12301.6, in collaboration with the applicable county, shall administer a backup provider system for in-home supportive services and waiver personal care services providers in compliance with the requirements of this section and Section 12300.5.

(b) Under the backup provider system, a recipient shall be eligible to receive temporary in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services from a backup provider as set forth in this section if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The
 recipient has an urgent need for backup supportive services due to a need for personal care services that cannot be met by an existing provider, or because they are transitioning to home-based care and do not yet have an identified provider.

(2) The recipient’s health and safety will be at risk if they do not receive their regularly scheduled in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services such that it may result in the need for emergency services or out-of-home placement if backup supportive services are not provided.

(c) (1) The maximum total of hours received under the backup provider system shall not exceed 80 hours per state fiscal year for each eligible recipient. Exceptions to this 80-hour limit may be granted on an as-needed basis for severely impaired recipients, but shall not exceed 160 hours each state fiscal year. Exceptions shall
 only be granted if funding for the exception is appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(2) All service hours received under the backup provider system shall count toward the recipient’s total monthly authorized in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services hours, and shall not impact a recipient’s authorized monthly hours, or the maximum number of hours allowed under Section 12303.4 and subdivision (g) of Section 14132.95.

(3) If a recipient has two or more regular providers, on each occasion a recipient has a need for backup supportive services as specified in this section, an exception from an applicable provider workweek limitation set forth in this article may be authorized for one of the regular providers, as authorized pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12301.1, in lieu of finding a backup provider.

(d) The requirements established pursuant to this section shall not restrict or interfere with the right of a recipient to hire, terminate, and supervise their backup provider. If a recipient chooses not to use, or terminates, the backup provider referred to them by the county or public authority, it becomes the responsibility of the recipient to find and hire their own backup provider.

(e) To be eligible to provide authorized backup in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services and receive payment as a backup provider pursuant to this section, a backup provider shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The person shall not have been convicted of an offense specified in Section 12305.81 or 12305.87 within the past 10 years.

(2) The
 person shall have met all requirements of provider enrollment, as specified in Section 12301.24 and subdivision (a) of Section 12305.81.

(3) The person shall be enrolled as a provider through the county or public authority and meet all applicable local requirements to provide emergency backup care.

(f) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, backup providers shall be paid a wage that is two dollars ($2) above the current county or public authority locally negotiated wage rate for a provider of in-home supportive services and waiver personal care services.

(g) The backup provider system shall be operated, at a minimum, by the county or public authority during normal county or public authority operating hours Monday through Friday, excluding holidays.

(h) In operating the backup provider system, counties and public authorities shall only be responsible for the following:

(1) Recruiting, enrolling, and making reasonable efforts to identify and recruit available providers, to the extent possible.

(2) Responding to recipient requests for backup care.

(3) Referring recipients to one or more backup providers, if available and if consistent with the recipient’s preferences and needs. This section does not require a county or public authority to ensure the provision of backup services in the event the county or the public authority is unable to locate an available provider for referral.

(4) Entering information as required under this section in the Case Management Information and Payrolling
 System for purposes of tracking and payments to providers.

(i) Counties, public authorities, and the state shall be immune from liability resulting from a backup provider’s untimely response to a request for provider backup services, subject to applicable legal limits, including federal and state protections against discrimination.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions until regulations are adopted. The all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(2) The state shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 58.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.

(a) The intent of the Legislature in enacting this article is to provide supplemental or additional services to the social and rehabilitative services in Article 6 (commencing with Section 12250) of this chapter. The Legislature further intends that necessary in-home supportive services shall be provided in a uniform manner in every county based on individual need consistent with this chapter and, for the 1992–93 fiscal year the
 appropriation provided for those services in the Budget Act, in the absence of alternative in-home supportive services provided by an able and willing individual or local agency at no cost to the recipient, except as required under Section 12304.5. An able spouse who is available to assist the recipient shall be deemed willing to provide at no cost any services under this article except nonmedical personal services and paramedical services. When a spouse leaves full-time employment or is prevented from obtaining full-time employment because no other suitable provider is available and where the inability of the provider to provide supportive services may result in inappropriate placement or inadequate care, the spouse shall also be paid for accompaniment when needed during necessary travel to health-related appointments and protective supervision.

(b) Each county shall be notified of its allocation and projected caseload by July 31 of each
 fiscal year, or 30 days after the enactment of the Budget Act, whichever occurs later.

(c) This section shall remain operative until July 1, 1993, and on and after that date, shall remain inoperative until July 1, 1994, at which date, this section shall become operative.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 50.5) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 64, Sec. 48.   Effective June 30, 1993.   Note: This section, by its provisions in subd. (c), was inoperative from July 1, 1993, until July 1, 1994, during temporary operation of the related version as amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 64, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.1.

(a) The department shall adopt regulations establishing a uniform range of services available to all eligible recipients based upon individual needs. The availability of services under these regulations is subject to the provisions of Section 12301 and county plans developed pursuant to Section 12302.

(b) (1) The county welfare department shall assess each recipient’s continuing monthly need for in-home supportive services at varying intervals as necessary, but at least once every 12 months. The results of this assessment of monthly need for hours of in-home supportive services shall be divided by 4.33, to establish a recipient’s weekly authorized number of hours of
 in-home supportive services, subject to any of the following, as
 applicable:

(A) Within the limit of the assessed monthly need for hours of in-home supportive services, a county welfare department may adjust the authorized weekly hours of a recipient for any particular week for known recurring or periodic needs of the recipient.

(B) Within the limit of the assessed monthly need for hours of in-home supportive services, a county welfare department may temporarily adjust the authorized weekly hours of a recipient at the request of the recipient, to accommodate unexpected extraordinary circumstances, including, but not limited to, a situation arising out of a natural disaster.

(C) In addition to the flexibility provided to a recipient pursuant to subparagraph (C) of
 paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 12300.4, a recipient may request the county welfare department to adjust his or her weekly authorized hours of services to exceed 40 hours of weekly authorized hours of services per week, within his or her total monthly authorized hours of services. A request for adjustment may be made retroactive to the hours actually worked. The county welfare department shall not unreasonably withhold approval of a recipient request made pursuant to this subparagraph.

(2) For purposes of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), and prior to its implementation, the State Department of Social Services shall develop a process for requests made pursuant to that subparagraph. The process shall include all of the following:

(A) The procedure, standards, and
 timeline for making a request to adjust the authorized weekly hours of service for a recipient described in this section.

(B) The language to be used for notices about the process.

(C) Provisions for adjustments to authorization, and for authorization after services have been provided, when the criteria for approval have been met.

(D) A requirement that the opportunity for a revision to the limitations of this section shall be discussed at each annual reassessment, and also may be authorized by the county welfare department outside of the reassessment process.

(3) Recipients shall be timely informed of their total monthly and weekly authorized hours.

(4) The weekly authorization of services defined in this section shall be used solely for the purposes of ensuring compliance with the federal Fair Labor Standards Act and its implementing regulations.

(5) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters, or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), at the county’s option, assessments may be extended, on a case-by-case basis, for up to six months beyond
 the regular 12-month period, provided that the county documents that all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The recipient has had at least one reassessment since the initial program intake assessment.

(B) The recipient’s living arrangement has not changed since the last annual reassessment and the recipient lives with others, or has regular meaningful contact with persons other than his or her service provider.

(C) The recipient or, if the recipient is a minor, his or her parent or legal guardian, or if incompetent, his or her conservator, is able to satisfactorily direct the recipient’s care.

(D) There has not been a known change in the recipient’s supportive
 service needs within the previous 24 months.

(E) A report has not been made to, and there has been no involvement of, an adult protective services agency or agencies since the county last assessed the recipient.

(F) The recipient has not had a change in provider or providers for at least six months.

(G) The recipient has not reported a change in his or her need for supportive services that requires a reassessment.

(H) The recipient has not been hospitalized within the last three months.

(2) If some, but not all, of the conditions specified in paragraph (1) are met, the county may consider other factors
 in determining whether an extended assessment interval is appropriate, including, but not limited to, involvement in the recipient’s care of a social worker, case manager, or other similar representative from another human services agency, such as a regional center or county mental health program, or communications, or other instructions from a physician or other licensed health care professional that the recipient’s medical condition is unlikely to change.

(3) A county may reassess a recipient’s need for services at a time interval of less than 12 months from a recipient’s initial intake or last assessment if the county social worker has information indicating that the recipient’s need for services is expected to decrease in less than 12 months.

(d) A county shall assess a
 recipient’s need for supportive services any time that the recipient notifies the county of a need to adjust the supportive services hours authorized, or if there are other indications or expectations of a change in circumstances affecting the recipient’s need for supportive services.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, until emergency regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the department may implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions from the director. The department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than September 30, 2005, unless notification of a delay is made to the Chair of the Joint
 Legislative Budget Committee prior to that date. The notification shall include the reason for the delay, the current status of the emergency regulations, a date by which the emergency regulations shall be adopted, and a statement of need to continue use of all-county letters or similar instructions. The adoption of emergency regulations shall not be delayed, or the use of all-county letters or similar instructions be extended, beyond June 30, 2006.

(2) The adoption of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations authorized by this section are exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of
 Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days by which time final regulations shall be adopted. The department shall seek input from the entities listed in Section 12305.72 when developing all-county letters or similar instructions and the regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (SB 1040)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.15.

Effective January 1, 2010, the application for in-home supportive services shall contain a notice to the recipient that his or her provider or providers will be given written notice of the recipient’s authorized services and full number of services hours allotted to the recipient. The application shall inform recipients of the Medi-Cal toll-free telephone fraud hotline and Internet Web site for reporting suspected fraud or abuse in the provision or receipt of supportive services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 17, Sec. 1.   (AB 19 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.16.

Upon receipt of an application for in-home supportive services, the county shall provide the applicant with a confirmation number to serve as documentation that the applicant filed an application for in-home supportive services. The county may use the case number as the confirmation number.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (AB 1797)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.17.

Each county human services agency shall accept applications for benefits under this article by telephone, through facsimile, or in person, or, if the county is capable of accepting online applications or applications via email for benefits under this
 article, by email or other electronic means.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (AB 1021)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.18.

(a) A county welfare department may use materials provided by an electrical corporation that is serving the county to inform each applicant or recipient of benefits under this article that the applicant or recipient may be eligible to receive the
 additional higher energy allowance described in subdivision (c) of Section 739 of the Public Utilities Code and that they may also be eligible to register with their electrical corporation to receive any advanced notifications that are provided by a public utility when the public utility plans to deenergize portions of the electrical distribution system or in an emergency.

(b) For purposes of this section, “materials” means information that is on an internet website or printed, or both.

(c) Within 180 days of the enactment of this section, the department shall issue an all-county information notice informing counties of the enactment of this section and the importance of the dissemination of the information set forth in subdivision (a) to applicants for benefits under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   (SB 596)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.2.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation and coordination with county welfare departments and in accordance with Section 12305.72, shall establish and implement statewide hourly task guidelines and instructions to provide counties with a standard tool for consistently and accurately assessing service needs and authorizing service hours to meet those needs.

(2) The guidelines shall specify a range of time normally required for each supportive service task
 necessary to ensure the health, safety, and independence of the recipient. The guidelines shall also provide criteria to assist county workers to determine when an individual’s service need falls outside the range of time provided in the guidelines.

(3) In establishing the guidelines the department shall consider, among other factors, adherence to universal precautions, existing utilization patterns and outcomes associated with different levels of utilization, and the need to avoid cost shifting to other government program services. During the development of the guidelines the department may seek advice from health professionals such as public health nurses or physical or occupational therapists.

(b) A county shall use the statewide hourly task guidelines when conducting an individual assessment or reassessment of an individual’s need for supportive services.

(c) Subject to the limits imposed by Section 12303.4, counties shall approve an amount of time different from the guideline amount whenever the individual assessment indicates that the recipient’s needs require an amount of time that is outside the range provided for in the guidelines. Whenever task times outside the range provided in the guidelines are authorized the county shall document the need for the authorized service level.
